Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 1 COLORADO CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
26.5-4-111. Services - eligibility - assistance provided - waiting lists - rules - exceptions from cooperating with child support establishment - repeal.

Subject to available appropriations and pursuant to department rules promulgated for the implementation of this part 1, a county shall provide child care assistance to a participant or any person or family whose income is not more than one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level. Subject to available appropriations and as necessary to comply with federal law or to align eligibility across early care and education programs specifically to meet the early care and education, income security, and child welfare needs of similar populations and as allowed by federal regulations, the executive director by rule may adjust the percentage of the federal poverty level used to determine child care assistance eligibility and shall revise income and verification requirements that promote alignment and simplification.

A county may provide child care assistance for any family whose income at initial determination exceeds the requirements of subsection (1) of this section but does not exceed the maximum federal level for eligibility for services of eighty-five percent of the state median income for a family of the same size if it is serving all eligible families who have applied for CCCAP and whose income level is below that requirement.

If, during a participant's, person's, or family's twelve-month eligibility period, the participant's, person's, or family's income rises to or above the level set by department rule at which the county may deny such participant, person, or family child care assistance, the county shall continue providing the current CCCAP subsidy until that participant's, person's, or family's next twelve-month redetermination.

If, at the time of a participant's, person's, or family's twelve-month eligibility redetermination, the participant's, person's, or family's income rises to or above the level set by department rule at which the county may deny child care assistance, or if that income level rises above the maximum federal eligibility level of eighty-five percent of the state median income for a family of the same size, the county shall immediately notify the participant, person, or family that it is no longer eligible for CCCAP.

Subject to available appropriations, pursuant to rules promulgated for implementation of this part 1, and except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section, a county shall provide child care assistance for a family transitioning off the works program due to employment or job training without requiring the family to apply for low-income child care but shall redetermine the family's eligibility within twelve months after the transition.

A family that transitions off the works program must not be automatically transitioned to CCCAP pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section if either of the following conditions apply:

The family is leaving the works program due to a violation of program requirements as defined in part 7 of article 2 of title 26 or by department rule; or

The family is leaving the works program due to employment and will be at an income level that exceeds the income eligibility limit for the CCCAP.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

A recipient of child care assistance through CCCAP is responsible for paying a portion of the recipient's child care costs based upon the recipient's income and the formula developed by department rule.
(4) (a) (I) A recipient of child care assistance through CCCAP is responsible for paying a portion of the recipient's child care costs based upon the recipient's income and the formula developed by department rule.

Upon notification to counties by the department that the relevant case management systems, including the Colorado child care automated tracking system, are capable of accommodating this subsection (4)(a)(II), for a family living at or below one hundred percent of the federal poverty level, the family copayment responsibility must be restricted to no more than one percent of the family's gross monthly income as determined based on one month of income.

Pursuant to department rules and upon notification to counties by the department that the relevant case management systems, including the Colorado child care automated tracking system, are capable of accommodating this subsection (4)(a)(III), income received during the past thirty days must be used in determining the copayment, unless on a case-by-case basis the prior thirty-day period does not provide an accurate indication of anticipated income, in which case a county can require evidence of up to twelve of the most recent months of income. A family may also provide evidence of up to twelve of the most recent months of income if it chooses to do so if such evidence more accurately reflects an ability to afford the required family copayment.

The executive director by rule shall establish, and at least every five years review and revise, as appropriate, a copayment schedule so that the copayment gradually increases as the family income approaches self-sufficiency income levels. This revised copayment schedule should allow families to retain a portion of their increases in income.

A participant who is employed shall pay a portion of the participant's income for child care assistance under CCCAP. The participant's required copayment pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (4)(c) must be determined by a formula established by department rule that takes into consideration the factors set forth in subsections (4)(a) and (4)(b) of this section.

On and after July 1, 2014, and except as otherwise provided in subsection (5)(b) or (5)(c) of this section, a county may require a person who receives child care assistance pursuant to this section and who is not otherwise a participant to apply, pursuant to section 26-13-106 (2), for child support establishment, modification, and enforcement services related to any support owed by obligors to their children and to cooperate with the delegate child support enforcement unit to receive these services; except that a person is not required to submit a written application for child support establishment, modification, and enforcement services if the person shows good cause to the county implementing the Colorado child care assistance program for not receiving these services.

A county shall not require an applicant who is a teen parent, as defined by department rule, and who is not otherwise a participant to submit a written application for child support establishment, modification, and enforcement services as a condition of receiving child care assistance pursuant to this section until the teen parent has graduated from high school or successfully completed a high school equivalency examination. After the teen parent has been determined eligible for child care assistance and the teen parent's chosen child care provider is receiving subsidy payments, a county may require the teen parent to regularly attend, at no cost and at a location and time most convenient to the teen parent, information sessions with the county child support staff focused on understanding the benefits of child support to the child, the family as a whole, and the benefits of two-parent engagement in a child's life. Once a person who receives child care assistance pursuant to this section no longer meets the definition of a teen parent or has either graduated from high school or successfully completed a high school equivalency examination, the county may require that person to cooperate with child support establishment and enforcement as a condition of continued receipt of child care assistance. This section does not prevent a teen parent from establishing child support.

A county shall not require an applicant to submit a written application for child support establishment, modification, and enforcement services as a condition of receiving child care assistance or to establish good cause for not cooperating with child support establishment as a condition of receiving child care assistance if the applicant:

Submits a statement that the applicant is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1) and in part 8 of article 6 of title 18; or a victim of a sexual offense, as described in part 4 of article 3 of title 18, section 18-6-301, or section 18-6-302; or a victim of harassment, as described in section 18-9-111; or a victim of stalking, as described in section 18-3-602;

Indicates in that statement that the applicant fears for his or her safety or the safety of the applicant's children if the applicant were to pursue child support enforcement pursuant to section 26-13-106 (2); and

Submits evidence that the applicant is a victim of domestic violence, a sexual offense, harassment, or stalking as described in subsection (5)(c)(I)(A) of this section.

For purposes of subsection (5)(c)(I)(C) of this section, sufficient evidence includes, but is not limited to, evidence identified for participation in the address confidentiality program included in section 24-30-2105 (3)(c)(I) to (3)(c)(IV), or from a "victim's advocate", as defined in section 13-90-107 (1)(k)(II), from whom the applicant has sought assistance.

A county may provide information about the importance of establishing child support to a victim of domestic violence, a sexual offense, harassment, or stalking who chooses not to engage in child support establishment or to pursue a good cause waiver from cooperation.

The executive director shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this subsection (5), including but not limited to rules establishing good cause for not receiving these services; rules for the imposition of sanctions upon a person who fails, without good cause as determined by the county implementing the Colorado child care assistance program, to apply for child support enforcement services or to cooperate with the delegate child support enforcement unit as required by this subsection (5); and rules regarding the option of counties to make cooperation with child support establishment and enforcement a condition of receiving child care assistance for teen parents and for victims of domestic violence, sexual offense, harassment, or stalking.

On July 1, 2017, and every July 1 thereafter through July 1, 2025, each county department shall report to the department information related to teen parents in the Colorado child care assistance program. The executive director shall establish, by rule, criteria to be reported annually by each county, including but not limited to:

The total number of cases in each county that are receiving services from a county child support services office that involve custodial parties who are nineteen years of age or younger and the number of children being served;

The total number of teen parents in each county that are receiving Colorado child care assistance;

For each teen parent receiving child care assistance in the county, longitudinal data indicating whether paternity has been established and whether child support has been established for the child and reported for the child from birth to age four;

For each teen parent receiving child care assistance in the county, longitudinal data indicating whether the teen parent achieved economic self-sufficiency and avoided becoming a Colorado works participant while in school and reported for the child from the child's birth to age four;

For each teen parent receiving child care assistance in the county, longitudinal data indicating the total amount and the percentage of child support collected for the benefit of the child and reported for the child from birth to age four.

The reports filed with the department as a result of this subsection (5)(e) are public records available for public inspection.

Upon notification that the relevant case management systems are capable of accommodating the provisions in subsections (5)(b) and (5)(c) of this section, the department is required to start tracking counties' compliance with subsections (5)(b) and (5)(c) of this section. The department shall notify counties when the case management systems are functional and when the tracking of compliance will begin.

This subsection (5) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Effective July 1, 2023, a county shall not require a person who applies for child care assistance pursuant to this section to participate in child support establishment, modification, and enforcement services related to any support owed by obligors to their children or to cooperate with the delegate child support enforcement unit as a condition of receiving child care assistance services. This subsection (6) does not prohibit a county from educating applicants about the benefits of child support and child support establishment, modification, and enforcement services, and how to engage in the child support process.

For a family with a child who is enrolled in both CCCAP and a head start program or, as soon as practicable after July 1, 2023, both CCCAP and the Colorado universal preschool program, the family's CCCAP eligibility redetermination must occur no sooner than the end of the last month of the child's first full twelve-month program year of enrollment in the head start or Colorado universal preschool program. Child care assistance program eligibility redetermination for a child enrolled in both programs must occur once every twelve months thereafter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 26-1-127 (2)(a), a family that receives child care assistance pursuant to this part 1 is not required to report income or activity changes during the twelve-month eligibility period; except that, within the twelve-month eligibility period, a family is required to report a change in income if the family's income exceeds eighty-five percent of the state median income.

A parent must not be determined ineligible to receive child care assistance pursuant to this part 1 as a result of:

Taking maternity leave;

Being a separated spouse or parent under a validly issued temporary order for parental responsibilities or child custody where the other spouse or parent has disqualifying financial resources;

Each instance of nontemporary job loss for less than ninety days; or

A temporary break in eligible activity, as defined by department rule.

Subject to available appropriations and pursuant to department rules promulgated for the implementation of this part 1, a parent who is enrolled in a postsecondary education program or a workforce training program is eligible for CCCAP for at least any two years of the postsecondary education or workforce training program, provided all other CCCAP eligibility requirements are met during those two years. On and after July 1, 2023, a county may only give priority for services to a working family over a family enrolled in postsecondary education or workforce training if the county does not have sufficient funding and has received approval from the department before implementing the prioritization.

To provide continuous child care with the least disruption to the child, authorized child care through CCCAP must promote continuous, consistent, and regular care and must not be linked directly to a parent's employment, education, or workforce training schedule. Pursuant to department rules, the amount of child care authorized should be based on the parent's and child's needs for child care.

Pursuant to department rules and upon notification to counties by the department that the relevant case management systems, including the Colorado child care automated tracking system, are capable of accommodating this subsection (8), income received during the past thirty days must be used in determining eligibility unless, on a case-by-case basis, the prior thirty-day period does not provide an accurate indication of anticipated income, in which case a county can require evidence of up to twelve of the most recent months of income. A family may also provide evidence of up to twelve of the most recent months of income if it chooses to do so if such evidence more accurately reflects a family's current income level.

A county has the authority to develop a voucher system for families enrolled in CCCAP through which they can secure relative or unlicensed child care.

An early care and education provider or county may conduct a pre-eligibility determination for child care assistance for a family to facilitate the determination process. The early care and education provider shall submit its pre-eligibility documentation to the county for final determination of eligibility for child care assistance. The early care and education provider or county may provide services to the family prior to final determination of eligibility, and the county shall reimburse a provider for such services only if the county determines the family is eligible for services and there is no need to place the family on a waiting list. If the family is found ineligible for services, the county shall not reimburse the early care and education provider for any services provided during the period between its pre-eligibility determination and the county's final determination of eligibility.

A provider or a local coordinating organization, as defined in section 26.5-2-102, may accept a family's CCCAP application and submit it to the county on behalf of a family seeking child care assistance.

Each county:

Upon notification to counties by the department that the relevant case management systems, including the Colorado child care automated tracking system, are capable of accommodating this subsection (12)(a), and pursuant to department rules, in addition to regular provider reimbursement rates, shall pay providers for care in alignment with common practices in the private market for child care. The department rules governing payment policies must allow daily reimbursement rates only for drop-in child care, back-up child care, and care that is commonly paid on a daily reimbursement basis in the child care market and must incentivize providers to promote regular program attendance.

Shall maintain a current and accurate waiting list of parents who have inquired about securing a CCCAP subsidy and are likely to be eligible for CCCAP based on self-reported income and job, education, or workforce training activity if families are not able to be served at the time of application due to funding concerns. Counties may enroll families off waiting lists according to local priorities and may require an applicant to restate the applicant's intention to be kept on the waiting list every six months in order to maintain the applicant's place on the waiting list.

Shall post eligibility, authorization, and administration policies and procedures so they are easily accessible and readable to a layperson. The policies must be sent to the department for compilation.

May use its CCCAP allocation to provide enrollment contracts or grants to early care and education providers: To support implementation of the local community plan described in section 26.5-2-104; to increase the supply and improve the quality of child care for infants and toddlers, children with disabilities, after-hours care, and children in underserved neighborhoods; to provide stability for the early childhood sector; and to improve alignment with the provision of additional preschool services, as defined in section 26.5-4-203, to working families who need additional care;

Subject to available appropriations and pursuant to department rules, and upon notification to counties by the department that the relevant case management systems, including the Colorado child care automated tracking system, are capable of accommodating this subsection (12)(e), shall use eligibility determination information from other public assistance programs and systems to determine CCCAP eligibility, including eligibility determination information used for children participating in the Colorado universal preschool program; and

Shall prioritize child care assistance for certified foster parents, certified kinship foster parents, noncertified kinship care providers that provide care for children with an open child welfare case who are in the legal custody of a county department, and noncertified kinship care providers that provide care for children with an open child welfare case who are not in the legal custody of a county department.

For children who are enrolled in both CCCAP and the Colorado universal preschool program, the executive director shall adopt rules as necessary to ensure:

Funds may be combined and coordinated to the extent allowed by law at the state and local level to ensure families can seamlessly access early childhood education and services and providers face the fewest possible systems to navigate to secure payment for services; and

Eligibility and authorization for services for the portions of both programs that are targeted to similar populations are aligned to the greatest extent practicable as allowed by federal regulations, including ensuring the state takes maximum advantage of flexibility in federal regulations to ensure that children who are eligible for both programs can seamlessly access the length and quality of programming that parents, children, and families need.

The executive director shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this part 1.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 670, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-805 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-4-112. Exemptions - requirements.

Notwithstanding any provision of section 26.5-4-111 to the contrary, an exempt family child care home provider, as defined in section 26.5-5-303, is not eligible to receive child care assistance money through CCCAP if the provider fails to meet the criteria established in section 26.5-5-326.

As a prerequisite to entering into a valid CCCAP contract with a county office or to being a party to any other payment agreement for the provision of care for a child whose care is funded in whole or in part with money received on the child's behalf from publicly funded state child care assistance programs, an exempt family child care home provider shall sign an attestation that affirms the provider, and any qualified adult residing in the exempt family child care home, has not been determined to be insane or mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and a court has not entered, pursuant to part 3 or 4 of article 14 of title 15, or section 27-65-109 (4) or 27-65-127, an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency or insanity is of such a degree that the provider cannot safely operate an exempt family child care home.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 678, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-805.5 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-4-113. No individual entitlement.

Nothing in this part 1 or any rules promulgated pursuant to this part 1 creates a legal entitlement in any person to child care assistance.

A county shall not create nor be interpreted as having created a legal entitlement in any person to assistance pursuant to this part 1.

Child care assistance awarded pursuant to this part 1 is awarded and held subject to the provisions of any amending or repealing law, and a recipient does not have a claim for compensation or otherwise by reason of the recipient's child care assistance being affected in any way by an amending or repealing law.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 679, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-806 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-4-114. Colorado child care assistance program - reporting requirements.

On or before November 1, 2022, and on or before November 1 each year thereafter, the department shall prepare a report on CCCAP. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the department shall provide the report to the joint budget committee of the general assembly, the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees. The report must include, at a minimum, the following information related to benchmarks of success for CCCAP:

The number of children and families served through CCCAP statewide and by county, which, beginning November 1, 2024, must include the number of children served in part-time child care through CCCAP and the number of children served in full-time child care through CCCAP, both groups disaggregated by ages from birth through thirteen years of age;

The average length of time that parents remain in the workforce while receiving CCCAP subsidies, even when their income increases;

The average number of months of uninterrupted, continuous care for children enrolled in CCCAP;

The number and percent of all children enrolled in CCCAP who receive care at each level of the state's quality and improvement rating system;

The average length of time a family is authorized for a CCCAP subsidy, disaggregated by recipients' eligible activities, such as job search, employment, workforce training, and postsecondary education;

The number of families on each county's wait list as of November 1 of each year, as well as the average length of time each family remains on the wait list in each county;

The number of families and children statewide and by county that exit CCCAP due to their family incomes exceeding the eligibility limits;

The number of families and children statewide and by county that reenter CCCAP within two years of exiting due to their family incomes exceeding the eligibility limits;

An estimate of unmet need for CCCAP in each county and throughout the state based on estimates of the number of children and families who are likely to be eligible for CCCAP in each county but who are not enrolled in CCCAP, disaggregated by estimated ages from birth through thirteen years of age; and

Beginning with the report submitted November 1, 2024, and in each annual report thereafter:

A year-over-year comparison of the number of children served by CCCAP to show fluctuations in the number of children served;

The number of informal, license-exempt providers, in-home providers, community-based providers, and school-based providers that agree to serve children with a CCCAP subsidy compared to the total number of providers;

The number of provider agreements and enrollment contracts with providers;

An explanation of the calculation of the most recently adopted provider rates; and

An explanation of the quality incentives made available to providers.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 679, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-2-809 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-4-115. Performance contracts.

Each county, either acting singly or with a group of counties, shall enter into an annual performance contract with the department that identifies the county's or group of counties' and the department's duties and responsibilities in implementing the child care assistance program. The performance contract must include, but need not be limited to, requirements and provisions that address each party's duties and responsibilities to work in a collaborative manner to administer, financially support, and implement the child care assistance program using fair and objective criteria.

A county or group of counties may be penalized for not meeting any obligation under the performance contract. The penalties must be identified in the performance contract and may include a reduction in a future county block grant allocation.

The performance contract must set forth the circumstances under which the department may elect that it or its agent assume the county's or group of counties' administration and implementation of the child care assistance program.

If a disagreement concerning the performance contract arises between the county or group of counties and the department, either party may request resolution of the disagreement through an independent dispute resolution process that is agreed upon by the parties. If necessary to assure services are available within the county or group of counties, the department may enter into a temporary agreement with the county or group of counties or with another public or private agent until the disagreement is resolved.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 680, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-116. Recovery from recipient - estate.

If, at any time during the continuance of child care assistance, the recipient becomes possessed of property having a value in excess of that amount set pursuant to the provisions of section 26.5-4-106 (4) and department rules or receives any increase in income, the recipient shall notify the county department of the possession of the property or receipt of the income, and the county department may either terminate the child care assistance or alter the amount of child care assistance in accordance with the circumstances and department rules. To the extent not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, if the recipient is found to have committed an intentional program violation, the recipient is disqualified from participation in CCCAP for twelve months for the first incident, twenty-four months for a second incident, and permanently for a third or subsequent incident. This disqualification is mandatory and is in addition to any other penalty imposed by law. Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any previously provided excess child care assistance to which the recipient was not entitled is recoverable by the county as a debt due to the state and the county in proportion to the amount of child care assistance paid by each respectively; except that interest is charged and paid to the county department on any sum fraudulently obtained, calculated at the legal rate and calculated from the date the sum was paid to a provider on behalf of the recipient to the date the sum is recovered. If the debt for fraudulently obtained child care assistance, fraudulently obtained overpayments of child care assistance, or excess child care assistance paid for which the recipient was ineligible has been reduced to a judgment in a court of record in this state, the county department may seek a continuing garnishment to collect the debt under article 54.5 of title 13.

If, upon the death or mental incompetency of any recipient, the inventory of the recipient's estate shows assets in excess of the amount that the recipient was allowed to have in order to receive child care assistance, or if it be shown that the recipient was otherwise ineligible for child care assistance, then the claim of the county and state for the excess child care assistance paid for which the recipient was ineligible, if filed as required by section 15-12-804, has priority as a debt given preference under section 15-12-805 (1)(f.7).

When a recipient was ineligible for child care assistance solely because of property in excess of that permitted by department rules pursuant to section 26.5-4-106 (4), the amount for which the recipient is liable is the amount by which the property exceeded the amount allowable under said rules or the total amount of child care assistance received, whichever is the lesser amount. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, actions for the recovery of these sums must be prosecuted by the county department or the department in a court of record that has jurisdiction.

The department and a county department may elect not to attempt recovery of an overpayment of child care assistance from an individual who is no longer receiving public assistance or child care assistance if the overpayment amount is less than thirty-five dollars. If the overpayment amount owed by an individual who is no longer receiving public assistance or child care assistance is thirty-five dollars or more, the department and the county department may determine, consistent with the six-year time limitation for the execution on judgments involving state debt, that it is no longer cost-effective to continue to pursue recovery of the overpayment.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 681, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-4-117. Locating violators - recoveries.

The executive director or district attorneys may request and receive from departments, boards, bureaus, or other agencies of the state or any of its political subdivisions, and the same are required to provide, such assistance and data as will enable the department and county departments properly to carry out their powers and duties to locate and prosecute any person who fraudulently obtains child care assistance pursuant to this part 1. Any records established pursuant to the provisions of this section are available only to the department, the county departments, the attorney general, and the district attorneys, county attorneys, and courts having jurisdiction in fraud or recovery proceedings or actions.

All departments and agencies of the state and local governments shall cooperate in the location and prosecution of a person who fraudulently obtains child care assistance pursuant to this part 1, and, on request of the county or district board of human or social services, the county director, the department, or the district attorney of any judicial district in this state, shall supply all information on hand relative to the location, employment, income, and property of said persons, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the information confidential, except the laws pertaining to confidentiality of tax returns filed pursuant to law with the department of revenue. The department of revenue shall furnish at no cost to inquiring departments and agencies such information as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this part 1. The executive director shall, by rule, establish the procedures whereby this information is requested and provided. The department or county departments shall use such information only for the purposes of administering the Colorado child care assistance program pursuant to this part 1, and a district attorney shall use it only for the prosecution of persons who fraudulently obtain child care assistance pursuant to this part 1, and shall not use the information, or disclose it, for any other purpose.

A district attorney shall bill the actual costs and expenses incurred by the district attorney's office in carrying out the provisions of subsection (2) of this section to counties or a county within the judicial district in the proportions specified in section 20-1-302. Each county shall make an annual accounting to the department on all amounts recovered.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 682, § 3, effective July 1.